Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216I.05, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Preapplication coordinationnew text begin and approvalnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end At least 30 days before filing an application with the commission, an applicant must provide notice to: (1) each local unit of government within which a site or route may be proposed; (2) Minnesota Tribal governments, as defined under section 10.65, subdivision 2; and (3) the state technical resource agencies. The notice must describe the proposed project and provide the entities receiving the notice an opportunity for preapplication coordination or feedback. new text begin (b) An applicant applying for a permit for a solar project of any capacity must receive approval from each local unit of government and Minnesota Tribal government that has jurisdiction over the proposed site location. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216I.10, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Permit not required. A permit issued by the commission is not required to construct: (1) a small wind energy conversion system; (2) a power plant deleted text begin or solar energy generating systemdeleted text end with a capacity of less than 50 megawatts; (3) an energy storage system with a capacity of less than ten megawatts; (4) a transmission line that (i) has a capacity of 100 kilovolts or more, and (ii) is less than 1,500 feet in length; and (5) a transmission line that has a capacity of less than 100 kilovolts.